Hawaii statutes.
§604-6 Ejectment proceedings. Nothing
in section 604-5 shall preclude a district court from taking jurisdiction in
ejectment proceedings where the title to real estate does not come in question
at the trial of the action. If the defendant is defaulted or if on the trial
it is proved that the plaintiff is entitled to the possession of the premises,
the court shall give judgment for the plaintiff and shall issue a writ of
possession. The rules of court shall govern the stay of a writ of possession.
[L 1949, c 315, §1; RL 1955, §216-5; HRS §604-6; am L 1970, c 188, §14; am L
1971, c 144, §2]

Rules of Court

Stay, see DCRCP rule 62.

Case Notes

Plaintiff in ejectment need not show possession within twenty
years if plaintiff shows title and no adverse possession is proved. 7 H. 324
(1888).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next